Utah statutes.
76-6-506.2.   Financial transaction card offenses -- Unlawful use of card
-- False application for card.
It is unlawful for any person to:
(1)  knowingly use a false, fictitious, altered, counterfeit, revoked,
expired, stolen, or fraudulently obtained financial transaction card to obtain
or attempt to obtain credit, goods, property, or services;
(2)  knowingly, with the intent to defraud, use a financial transaction card,
credit number, personal identification code, or any other information
contained on the card or in the account from which the card is issued, to
obtain or attempt to obtain credit, goods, or services;
(3)  knowingly, with the intent to defraud, use a financial transaction card
to willfully exceed an authorized credit line by $500 or more, or by 50% or
more of the line of credit, whichever is greater;
(4) (a)  knowingly, with the intent to defraud, make application for a
financial transaction card to an issuer and make or cause to be made a false
statement or report of the person's name, occupation, financial condition,
assets, or personal identifying information; or
(b)  willfully and substantially undervalue or understate any indebtedness for
the purposes of influencing the issuer to issue the financial transaction
card; or
(5)  knowingly, with the intent to defraud, present or cause to be presented
to the issuer or an authorized credit card merchant, for payment or
collection, any credit card sales draft, if:
(a)  the draft is counterfeit or fictitious;
(b)  the purported sales evidenced by any credit card sales draft did not take
place;
(c)  the purported sale was not authorized by the card holder; or
(d)  the items or services purported to be sold as evidenced by the credit
card sales drafts are not delivered or rendered to the card holder or person
intended to receive them.
